Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 24.
PROBATE COURTS — CIRCUIT AND COUNTY CLERKS (CONST., ART. 7, §§ 19, 34, 35, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 7, §§ 19, 34, and 35. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the regular session of 1937 (see Acts 1937, p. 1400). It was adopted at the general election on Nov. 8, 1938, by a vote of 66,897 for and 52,632 against.

The amendment to Ark. Const., Art. 7, § 19, is incorporated in that section. Ark. Const., Art. 7, §§ 34 and 35, as amended by this Amendment, were repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 80, § 22, effective July 1, 2001.

Effective Dates.

Const. Amend. 24, § 4: the first day of January next following its adoption.